test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-85kakma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kakma: # Verb (85) '/(eng) to tear /(fin) repiä' - partial paradigm
     kakma+V+Inf/mA: kakma
     kakma+V+Inf: kakkuq
     kakma+V+Act+PrfPrc: kaknuq
     kakma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [kakut, kakutu]

     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaku
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kakut, kakudõq]
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kakk
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kakumiq
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kakutiq
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kakvaq
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: kaku
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [kaki, kaksõ]
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kakit, kakiq, kaksõt, kaksõq, kakidõq, kaksõdõq]
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [kakḱ, kaksõ]
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kakimiq, kaksõmiq]
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kakitiq, kaksõtiq]
     kakma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kakiq, kakivaq, kaksõq, kaksõvaq]

     kakma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kakuda
     kakma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kakutas

     kakma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kakva

     kakma+V+Jus: kakkuq
